Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-26] Life insurance policies;
penalties. (a) Where any life insurance policy on the life of a person in
military service is the subject of an action or proceeding under this chapter,
the court may:

(1) Stay the proceedings as provided in this chapter;
or

(2) Make such other disposition of the case as may be
equitable to preserve the interest of all parties.

This subsection shall not be construed in any
way as affecting or as limiting the scope of section 657D-23.

(b) Any person who knowingly acts in violation
of this section, or attempts to do so, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. [L
1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next